Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2518
Allocation of funds for street purposes; Department of Transportation; State Treasurer; duties.

The Department of Transportation shall compute the amount allocated to each municipality or municipal county under the factors listed in section 39-2517 and shall then compute the total allocation to each such municipality or municipal county and transmit such information to the local governing body and the State Treasurer, who shall disburse funds accordingly.

Laws 1969, c. 316, § 8, p. 1141;

Laws 1986, LB 729, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 50;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 170.